src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NI-scamhadh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:scamhadh^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:scamhafa^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:scamhadh      Voc-initial;

!!LEXICON NI-riocht
!!+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:riocht^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:reachta^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:riocht      Voc-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:riochtaí^C      Pl-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:riochtaí^G   Pl-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:riochtaí        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-saobhadh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:saobhadh^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:saofa^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:saobhadh      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-sciomradh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:sciomradh^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:sciomartha^M^G    Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:sciomradh     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:sciomarthaí^C     Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:sciomarthaí^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:sciomarthaí   Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-lionn
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:lionn^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:leanna^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:lionn     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:lionnta^C     Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:lionnta^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:lionnta       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-leadradh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:leadradh^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:leadartha^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:leadradh      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:leadarthaí^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:leadarthaí^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:leadarthaí        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-namhaid
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:namhaid^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:namhad^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:namhaid       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:naimhde^C     Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:naimhde^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:naimhde       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-bonnbhualadh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:bonnbhualadh^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:bonnbhuailte^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:bonnbhualadh      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:bonnbhuailte^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:bonnbhuailte^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:bonnbhuailte      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-slios
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:slios^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:sleasa^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:slios     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:sleasa^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:sleasa^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:sleasa        Voc-initial;

!!LEXICON NI-sliocht
!!+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:sliocht^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:sleachta^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:sliocht     Voc-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:sleachta^C      Pl-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:sleachta^G   Pl-initial;
!!+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:sleachta        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-gamhain
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:gamhain^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:gamhna^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:gamhain       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:gamhna^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:gamhna^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:gamhna        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-grafadh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:grafadh^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:grafa^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:grafadh       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-treabhadh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:treadhadh^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:treafa^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:treadhadh     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-adhradh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:adhradh^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:adhartha^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:adhradh       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-ionladh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:ionladh^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:ionnalta^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:ionladh       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-grásta
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:grásta^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:grásta^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:grásta        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:grásta^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl:grást^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:grásta        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-sean
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:sean^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:sean^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:sean      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:seana^C       Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl:sean^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:seana     Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-neach
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:neach^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:neach^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:neach     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:neacha^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl:neach^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:neacha        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-rinn
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:rinn^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:reanna^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:rinn      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:reanna^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl:rinn^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:reanna        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-rith
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:rith^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:reatha^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:rith      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:rití^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:rití^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:rití      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-ainm
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:ainm^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:ainm^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:ainm      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:ainmneacha^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:ainmneacha^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:ainmneacha        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-cine
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:cine^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:cine^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:cine      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:ciníocha^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:ciníocha^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:ciníocha      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-scríobh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:scríobh^M^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:scríofa^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:scríobh       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-fraoch
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:fraoch^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:fraoigh^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:fraoch        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-ioth
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:ioth^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:eatha^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:iotha         Voc-initial;


LEXICON NI-muileann
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:muileann^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:muilinn^M^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:muileann      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:muilte^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:muilte^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:muilte        Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-laoch
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:laoch^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:laoich^M^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:laoch     Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:laochra^C     Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:laochra^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:laochra       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-gníomh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:gníomh^M^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:gnímh^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:gníomh        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:gníomhartha^C     Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:gníomhartha^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:gníomhartha       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-briathar
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:briathar^M^C      Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:briathair^M^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:briathar      Voc-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:briathra^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong+Pl:briathra^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+Def:briathra      Voc-initial;
