src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounsIrregular
briathar:	NI-briathar;
gníomh:		NI-gníomh;
leorghníomh:leor^CB		NI-gníomh; ! reparation, restitution
laoch:		NI-laoch;
crannlaoch:crann		NI-laoch; ! old soldier
muileann:	NI-muileann;
fraoch:		NI-fraoch;
ioth:		NI-ioth;
cine:		NI-cine;  ! pl -níocha race, fear
scríobh:	NI-scríobh;
coinscríobh:coin^CB	NI-scríobh;
ainm:		NI-ainm;
cnuasainm:cnuas		NI-ainm;
leasainm:leas		NI-ainm;
logainm:log		NI-ainm;
forainm:for		NI-ainm;
rith:		NI-rith;
táinrith:táin		NI-rith;
sean:		NI-sean;
neach:		NI-neach;
rinn:		NI-rinn;
gamhain:		NI-gamhain;
slios:			NI-slios;
bonnbhualadh:		NI-bonnbhualadh;
namhaid:		NI-namhaid;
adhradh:		NI-adhradh;
íoladhradh:íol		NI-adhradh;
treabhadh:		NI-treabhadh;
grafadh:		NI-grafadh;
ionladh:		NI-ionladh;
leadradh:		NI-leadradh;
lionn:		NI-lionn;
sciomradh:	NI-sciomradh;
saobhadh:	NI-saobhadh;
scamhadh:		NI-scamhadh;
grásta:		NI-grásta;
